Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 123 Corrupt Practices [Repealed]

123.005.
Definition
of terms in KRS 123.051 to 123.101. [Repealed.]

123.010.
Contributions
to candidates by corporations prohibited. [Repealed.]

123.020.
Contributions
to political organizations by corporations prohibited. [Repealed.]

123.030.
Contributions
to certain candidates by individuals prohibited. [Repealed.]

123.040.
Candidate
not to make expenditure, or agreement as to action when elected, to secure
vote or support. [Repealed.]

123.045.
Political
advertising charged at ordinary rate; injunction. [Repealed.]

123.050.
Purposes
for which candidates may make expenditures — Amount limited. [Repealed.]

123.051.
Applicability.
[Repealed.]

123.055.
Registry
of Election Finance — Members — Appointment — Qualifications
— Terms — Vacancies — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed.]

123.060.
Statement
of contributions and expenditures to be filed by candidate prior and subsequent
to nomination date. [Repealed.]

123.061.
Duties
and powers of registry. [Repealed.]

123.065.
Campaign
contributions and expenditures, regulations. [Repealed.]

123.070.
Statement
of contributions and expenditures to be filed by candidate prior and subsequent
to election date. [Repealed.]

123.071.
Campaign
treasurers. [Repealed.]

123.075.
Registration
of committees. [Repealed.]

123.080.
Statement
of contributions and expenditures for candidate or public question to be filed
by campaign committees and managers. [Repealed.]

123.081.
Regulations
as to deposit and withdrawal of campaign funds. [Repealed.]

123.085.
Notice
and forms for statement of contributions and expenditures to be sent to candidates
and committees. [Repealed.]

123.086.
Reports
of executive committees and campaign treasurers — Time for making —
Contents. [Repealed.]

123.090.
Failure
to file statement — Effect of. [Repealed.]

123.091.
Campaign
depository’s statement after election. [Repealed.]

123.095.
Identification
of contributors and advertisers. [Repealed.]

123.100.
Public
may inspect statements — Obtain copies. [Repealed.]

123.101.
Reports
kept two years — Evidence. [Repealed.]

123.110.
Employe’s
vote not to be coerced. [Repealed.]

123.120.
Assessment
of state or Federal employe prohibited. [Repealed.]

123.130.
Regulation
of printed matter relative to candidates for office. [Repealed.]

123.990.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]

123.991.
Penalties.
[Repealed.]

123.992.
Penalty.
[Repealed.]